Iowa, session 2025-2026, SSB1002.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 TLSB 1690XC (2) 91 cm/jh S.F. _____ Section 1. Section 633C.3, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 1 2025, is amended to read as follows: 2 a. A reasonable amount may be paid or set aside each month 3 for necessary expenses of the trust, not to exceed ten fifty 4 dollars per month without court approval. 5 Sec. 2. Section 633C.3, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 6 2025, is amended to read as follows: 7 a. A reasonable amount may be paid or set aside each month 8 for necessary expenses of the trust, not to exceed ten fifty 9 dollars per month without court approval. 10